Illinois, session 104th, HB5396.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Healthy Soils Task Force Act. 6    Section 5. Findings.7    (a) The General Assembly finds that healthy soils are a 8limited natural resource and fundamental for healthy and 9sustainable food production. Improving soil health means 10increasing soil organic matter and diversifying soil's 11microbial activity to enhance agricultural productivity and 12environmental resilience.13    (b) As Illinois is a leading agricultural state with 14productive soils and abundant water supplies, a commitment to 15healthy and productive soils and clean water is critical as 16population and food production demands rise. However, the 17State's soil has been depleted of organic matter and trace 18minerals, making the soil less fertile, requiring more inputs, 19and resulting in a degradation of the soil structure that 20builds resilience and helps to maintain clean water.21    (c) There is a real and pressing opportunity for the 22State's farmers to capitalize on the economic and production 23benefits of improved soil health, while simultaneously   HB5396- 2 -LRB104 16581 BDA 29980 b1improving surface and groundwater quality. Improving the 2health of the State's soil is the most effective way for 3agricultural producers to increase crop and forage 4productivity and profitability while also protecting the 5environment.6    (d) The General Assembly finds that appropriate planning 7and coordination is needed to accelerate and coordinate the 8adoption of conservation practices that: 9        (1) rebuild and protect soil carbon to increase water 10    holding capacity and enhance the vitality of the 11    subsurface microbiome for landowners to capitalize on the 12    economic and production benefits of soil health;13        (2) enhance water quality;14        (3) capture carbon;15        (4) build resilience to drought and pests;16        (5) reduce greenhouse gas emissions;17        (6) expand pollinator and other wildlife habitats; and18        (7) protect fragile ecosystems for a more sustainable 19    future. 20    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:21    "Commodity crops" means large-scale agricultural products 22grown for global trade and industrial use rather than direct 23consumption. "Commodity crops" includes corn, soybeans, wheat, 24rice, and other large-scale agricultural products grown for 25global trade, animal feed, biofuels, or processed foods.  HB5396- 3 -LRB104 16581 BDA 29980 b1    "Task Force" means the Healthy Soils Task Force created in 2Section 15 of this Act. 3    Section 15. Healthy Soils Task Force.4    (a) The Healthy Soils Task Force is created in the 5Department of Agriculture for the purposes described in 6Section 5 of this Act. The Task Force shall consist of the 7Director of Agriculture or the Director's designee, who shall 8be a voting member of the Task Force, and the following voting 9members appointed by the Governor:10        (1) 2 members who are representatives of soil and 11    water conservation districts;12        (2) one member who is an academic expert in 13    agriculture and soil health from the Prairie Research 14    Institute at the University of Illinois;15        (3) one member who is an academic expert in 16    agriculture and soil health from the Cooperative Extension 17    Service of the University of Illinois;18        (4) one member who is an academic expert in 19    agriculture and soil health from the College of 20    Agricultural, Consumer and Environmental Sciences at the 21    University of Illinois;22        (5) one member who is an academic expert in 23    agriculture and soil health from the Department of 24    Agriculture at Illinois State University;25        (6) 3 members who are farmers who do not grow   HB5396- 4 -LRB104 16581 BDA 29980 b1    commodity crops, including at least 2 farmers who are 2    using healthy soil practices;3        (7) 2 members who are farmers who grow commodity 4    crops;5        (8) one member who is a representative of an 6    Illinois-based environmental organization;7        (9) 2 members who are representatives of national farm 8    or conservation organizations; each such representative 9    shall be from a different organization;10        (10) one member who is a representative of a 11    sustainable agriculture organization; and12        (11) 2 members who are representatives of Illinois 13    farm organizations.14    (b) The Task Force shall consist of the following 15nonvoting members:16        (1) the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the 17    Speaker's designee;18        (2) the President of the Senate or the President's 19    designee;20        (3) the House Minority Leader or the House Minority 21    Leader's designee; and22        (4) the Senate Minority Leader or the Senate Minority 23    Leader's designee.24    (c) In selecting membership for appointment to the Task 25Force, the Governor shall seek to appoint members with 26expertise in methods for incorporating systems of healthy soil   HB5396- 5 -LRB104 16581 BDA 29980 b1stewardship into working agricultural operations and for 2optimizing environmental services provided through such 3practices. The Governor shall make appointments to the Task 4Force not later than 60 days after the effective date of this 5Act, and appointed members shall begin serving immediately. 6Members shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary 7expenses incurred in carrying out their duties as members.8    (d) The Director of Agriculture shall call the first 9meeting of the Task Force not later than 90 days after the 10effective date of this Act. At its first meeting, the members 11shall elect a chairperson. After the initial meeting, the Task 12Force shall meet as necessary at the call of the chairperson.13    (e) The Department of Agriculture shall provide 14administrative and other support to the Task Force. The Task 15Force may request additional assistance from appropriate 16federal and State agencies.17    (f) The Task Force shall do all of the following:18        (1) The Task Force shall develop a comprehensive 19    healthy soils initiative for the State.20        (2) The Task Force shall develop a comprehensive 21    action plan to coordinate efforts to carry out the healthy 22    soils initiative using standards for organic matter, 23    biological activity, biological diversity, and soil 24    structure as measures to assess improved soil health. The 25    action plan shall establish goals, formulate timelines for 26    task completion, and determine resources required and   HB5396- 6 -LRB104 16581 BDA 29980 b1    resource availability. In developing the action plan, the 2    Task Force shall examine (i) issues related to providing 3    farmers and ranchers with research, education, technical 4    assistance, and demonstration projects; (ii) options for 5    financial incentives to improve soil health; and (iii) the 6    contribution of livestock to soil health.7        (3) The Task Force shall develop recommendations for 8    testing for chemicals, including dioxin, in the soil.9        (4) The Task Force shall develop recommendations for 10    the use of plants for soil remediation.11        (5) The Task Force shall identify realistic and 12    achievable goals and timelines for improvement of soil 13    health in the State through voluntary partnerships among 14    agricultural producers and relevant State and local 15    agencies and other public and private entities.16        (6) The Task Force shall review provisions of relevant 17    federal law, including any implementing rules, 18    regulations, and guidelines of the United States 19    Department of Agriculture and identify opportunities to 20    leverage State, local, or private funds under the Regional 21    Conservation Partnership Program of the United States 22    Department of Agriculture and other conservation programs 23    for the purposes of the healthy soils initiative. The Task 24    Force shall include information obtained from the review 25    in the report issued under this Section.26    (g) To carry out its duties, the Task Force may consult   HB5396- 7 -LRB104 16581 BDA 29980 b1with other agencies or organizations, including all of the 2following:3        (1) the Prairie Research Institute at the University 4    of Illinois; the Cooperative Extension Service of the 5    University of Illinois; the College of Agricultural, 6    Consumer and Environmental Sciences at the University of 7    Illinois; and the Department of Agriculture at Illinois 8    State University;9        (2) the Natural Resources Conservation Service, the 10    Farm Service Agency, and the Agricultural Research Service 11    of the United States Department of Agriculture;12        (3) the Soil Health Institute;13        (4) the Soil Health Partnership or a successor or 14    similar program; and15        (5) any other State or federal agencies or public or 16    private entities with responsibility or expertise in 17    research, demonstration, education, advising, funding, or 18    promotion relating to agronomic and other agricultural 19    land management practices consistent with the purposes of 20    the Task Force.21    (h) On or before December 31, 2027, the Task Force shall 22submit a report that shall include the comprehensive action 23plan and the results of the Task Force's other duties under 24subsection (f) of this Section, as well as the Task Force's 25findings and recommendations, to the Governor and the General 26Assembly, as provided in Section 3.1 of the General Assembly   HB5396- 8 -LRB104 16581 BDA 29980 b1Organization Act. 2    Section 20. Repeal. The Task Force is dissolved and this 3Act is repealed on July 1, 2028.